Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.375

Substantial compliance with procedures.

No rule proposed after July 1, 1989, is valid unless it is adopted in substantial compliance with RCW 34.05.310 through 34.05.395. Inadvertent failure to mail notice of a proposed rule adoption to any person as required by RCW 34.05.320(3) does not invalidate a rule. No action based upon this section may be maintained to contest the validity of any rule unless it is commenced within two years after the effective date of the rule.

[ 1988 c 288 s 314.]